pl: Typ mocowania paska gitarowego: Hak do otworu rezonansowego w gitarze akustycznej; Wbudowane blokady paska; Wiązanie klasyczne (na główce); Podwójne mocowanie (otwór rezonansowy + kołek); Klipsy z szybkim odpinaniem; Standardowe końcówki paska (bez wbudowanych blokad); Kompatybilne z blokadą paska (wymaga oddzielnych blokad); Inne
th: ประเภทการยึดสายสะพายกีตาร์: ตะขอเกี่ยวช่องเสียงกีตาร์โปร่ง; ตัวล็อกสายสะพายในตัว; แบบผูกสำหรับกีตาร์คลาสสิก (หัวกีตาร์); จุดยึดคู่ (ช่องเสียง + หมุดยึดสายสะพาย); คลิปแบบปลดเร็ว; ปลายสายสะพายมาตรฐาน (ไม่มีตัวล็อกในตัว); รองรับตัวล็อกสายสะพาย (ต้องใช้ตัวล็อกแยก); อื่นๆ
sv: Typ av fäste för gitarrrem: Krok för akustiskt ljudhål; Inbyggda axelbandslås; Klassisk knytning (gitarrhuvud); Dubbelt fäste (ljudhål och ändknopp); Snabblåsklämmor; Standardändar (inga inbyggda lås); Kompatibel med axelbandslås (kräver separata lås); Övrigt
sl-SI: Vrsta pritrditve kitarskega traku: Kavelj za akustično zvočnico; Vgrajeni zaklepi za pas; Klasična navezava (glava kitare); Dvojna pritrditev (zvočnica in končni zatič); Sponke za hitro odpenjanje; Standardni konci pasu (brez vgrajenih zaklepov); Združljivo z zaklepi za pas (zahteva ločene zaklepe); Drugo
hr-HR: Vrsta pričvršćivanja remena za gitaru: Kuka za zvučni otvor na akustičnoj gitari; Ugrađene brave za remen; Klasično vezivanje (glava gitare); Dvostruko pričvršćivanje (zvučni otvor + klin); Kopče za brzo otpuštanje; Standardni krajevi remena (bez ugrađenih brava); Kompatibilno s bravama za remen (zahtijeva zasebne brave); Ostalo
bg-BG: Тип закрепване на каишка за китара: Кука за звуков отвор на акустична китара; Вградени заключващи механизми; Завързване за класическа китара (на главата); Двойно закрепване (звуков отвор и пин); Клипсове за бързо освобождаване; Стандартни краища на колан (без вградено заключване); Съвместим със strap-lock (изисква отделни механизми); Други
es: Tipo de sujeción de la correa de guitarra: Gancho para boca de guitarra acústica; Bloqueos de correa integrados; Amarrable clásico (clavijero); Fijación doble (boca + pasador); Clips de liberación rápida; Extremos de correa estándar (sin bloqueos integrados); Compatible con bloqueos de correa (requiere bloqueos separados); Otro
fi: Kitaran hihnan kiinnitystyyppi: Akustisen ääniaukon koukku; Sisäänrakennetut hihnalukot; Klassinen sidottava (lapa); Kaksoiskiinnitys (ääniaukko ja hihnatappi); Pikakiinnikkeet; Vakiohihnapäät (ei sisäänrakennettuja lukkoja); Hihnalukkoyhteensopiva (vaatii erilliset lukot); Muu
nb: Festetype for gitarreim: Akustisk lydhullkrok; Innebygde stroppelåser; Klassisk knyting (gitarhode); Dobbelt feste (lydhull + endepinne); Hurtigkoblingsklemmer; Standard stroppeender (ingen innebygde låser); Kompatibel med stroppelås (krever separate låser); Annet
ja: ギターストラップ取り付けタイプ: アコースティックサウンドホールフック; ストラップロック内蔵; クラシックタイオン (ヘッドストック); デュアルアタッチメント (サウンドホール + エンドピン); クイックリリースクリップ; 標準ストラップエンド (ロック内蔵なし); ストラップロック対応 (別途ロックが必要); その他
en: Guitar strap attachment type: Acoustic soundhole hook; Built-in strap locks; Classical tie-on (headstock); Dual attachment (soundhole + endpin); Quick-release clips; Standard strap ends (no built-in locks); Strap-lock compatible (requires separate locks); Other
lt-LT: Gitaros diržo tvirtinimo tipas: Kabliukas į akustinės gitaros garso skylę; Integruoti diržo užraktai; Klasikinis užrišamas (ant grifo galvutės); Dvigubas tvirtinimas (garso skylė + galinis segtukas); Greito atleidimo segtukai; Standartiniai diržo galai (be integruotų užraktų); Suderinama su diržo užraktais (reikalingi atskiri užraktai); Kita
ro-RO: Tip de atașare a curei de chitară: Cârlig pentru gaura de rezonanță acustică; Sisteme de blocare a curelei integrate; Prindere clasică (capul chitarei); Prindere dublă (gaură de rezonanță + pinul curelei); Cleme cu eliberare rapidă; Capete de curea standard (fără sisteme de blocare integrate); Compatibil cu sisteme de blocare a curelei (necesită încuietori separate); Altele
vi: Loại gắn dây đeo đàn guitar: Móc lỗ thoát âm đàn acoustic; Khóa dây đeo tích hợp; Dây buộc đàn classic (đầu đàn); Gắn kép (lỗ thoát âm + chốt đáy); Kẹp tháo nhanh; Đầu dây đeo tiêu chuẩn (không tích hợp khóa); Tương thích khóa dây đeo (cần mua riêng khóa); Khác
el: Τύπος στερέωσης ζώνης κιθάρας: Γάντζος για την οπή ήχου ακουστικής; Ενσωματωμένες ασφάλειες ζώνης; Δέσιμο για κλασική (στο headstock); Διπλή στερέωση (οπή ήχου + endpin); Κλιπ γρήγορης απελευθέρωσης; Τυπικά άκρα ζώνης (χωρίς ενσωματωμένες ασφάλειες); Συμβατή με strap-lock (απαιτεί ξεχωριστές ασφάλειες); Άλλο
it: Tipo di attacco per tracolla per chitarra: Gancio per buca acustica; Blocca tracolla integrati; A laccio (paletta chitarra classica); Doppio attacco (buca + bottone reggicinghia); Clip a sgancio rapido; Estremità tracolla standard (senza blocchi integrati); Compatibile con blocca tracolla (richiede blocchi separati); Altro
zh-CN: 吉他背带连接方式: 原声吉他音孔挂钩; 内置背带锁; 古典绑系式（琴头）; 双连接（音孔 + 尾钉）; 快拆夹; 标准背带端（无内置锁）; 兼容背带锁（需单独购买背带锁）; 其他
de: Typ der Gitarrengurtbefestigung: Akustik-Schallloch-Haken; Integrierte Strap-Locks; Klassisch zum Binden (Kopfplatte); Doppelte Befestigung (Schallloch + Gurtpin); Schnellverschluss-Clips; Standard-Gurtenden (ohne integrierte Schlösser); Strap-Lock-kompatibel (erfordert separate Schlösser); Sonstige
hu: Gitárpánt rögzítési típusa: Akusztikus hanglyukkampó; Beépített hevederzár; Klasszikus felkötős (fejhez); Kettős rögzítés (hanglyuk + hevedertartó gomb); Gyorskioldó csatok; Szabványos hevedervégek (nincs beépített zár); Hevederzár-kompatibilis (külön zárat igényel); Egyéb
fr: Type de fixation de la sangle de guitare: Crochet pour rosace de guitare acoustique; Fixations pour sangle intégrées; À nouer (tête de guitare classique); Fixation double (rosace + attache-courroie); Clips à dégagement rapide; Extrémités de sangle standard (sans fixation intégrée); Compatible avec les fixations pour sangle (nécessite des fixations séparées); Autre
sk-SK: Typ upevnenia gitarového popruhu: Hák do rezonančného otvoru akustickej gitary; Zabudované zámky na popruh; Klasické uväzovanie (hlava gitary); Dvojité uchytenie (rezonančný otvor + gombík); Rýchloupínacie spony; Štandardné konce popruhu (bez zabudovaných zámkov); Kompatibilné so zámkami popruhu (vyžaduje samostatné zámky); Iné
nl: Gitaarband bevestiging type: Haak voor akoestisch klankgat; Ingebouwde straplocks; Klassieke bevestiging (kop); Dubbele bevestiging (klankgat + eindpen); Quick-release-clips; Standaard riemuiteinden (geen ingebouwde sloten); Straplock-compatibel (vereist afzonderlijke sloten); Overig
ko: 기타 스트랩 부착 유형: 어쿠스틱 사운드홀 후크; 내장형 스트랩 락; 클래식 타이온(헤드스톡); 이중 부착(사운드홀 + 엔드핀); 퀵 릴리스 클립; 표준 스트랩 끝부분(내장형 잠금장치 없음); 스트랩 락 호환(별도 잠금장치 필요); 기타
cs: Typ uchycení kytarového popruhu: Háček do ozvučného otvoru akustické kytary; Integrované zámky na popruh; Klasické uvazování (na hlavu kytary); Dvojité uchycení (ozvučný otvor + rolnička); Rychloupínací spony; Standardní konce popruhu (bez zámků); Kompatibilní se zámky na popruh (vyžaduje samostatné zámky); Ostatní
ru: Тип крепления ремня для гитары: Крючок для резонаторного отверстия; Встроенные стреплоки; Классическая завязка (на голову грифа); Двойное крепление (резонаторное отверстие + пуговица); Быстросъемные клипсы; Стандартные наконечники (без встроенных фиксаторов); Совместимость со стреплоками (требуются отдельные фиксаторы); Другое
tr: Gitar askısı bağlantı tipi: Akustik ses deliği kancası; Dahili askı kilitleri; Klasik bağlamalı (sap); Çift bağlantı (ses deliği + alt pim); Hızlı açılan klipsler; Standart askı uçları (dahili kilit yok); Askı kilidi uyumlu (ayrı kilit gerektirir); Diğer
zh-TW: 吉他背帶連接方式: 木吉他響孔掛鉤; 內建背帶鎖; 古典吉他綁帶 (琴頭); 雙重固定 (響孔 + 尾釘); 快拆扣; 標準背帶端 (無內建鎖); 相容背帶鎖 (需要額外的鎖); 其他
pt-BR: Guitarra correia fixação tipo: Gancho para boca de violão acústico; Travas de correia integradas; Amarração clássica (headstock); Fixação dupla (boca + pino de correia); Clipes de liberação rápida; Extremidades de correia padrão (sem travas integradas); Compatível com trava de correia (requer travas separadas); Outro
da: Type fastgørelse af guitarrem: Akustisk lydhulskrog; Indbyggede remlåse; Klassisk binding (guitarens hoved); Dobbelt fastgørelse (lydhul + endestift); Clips med hurtig frigørelse; Standardremender (ingen indbyggede låse); Kompatibel med remlås (kræver separate låse); Andet
pt-PT: tipo de fixação da correia da guitarra: Gancho de boca de guitarra acústica; Fechos de correia integrados; De atar clássica (cabeça); Dupla fixação (boca + pino de correia); Clipes de desengate rápido; Extremidades de correia padrão (sem fechos integrados); Compatível com fechos de correia (requer fechos em separado); Outro